Utah statutes.
41-6a-703.   Passing vehicles proceeding in opposite directions.

(1)  In accordance with Section 41-6a-701, a person operating a vehicle proceeding in an opposite direction from another vehicle shall pass the other vehicle to the right.

(2)  On a roadway having width for not more than one line of traffic in each direction, the operator of a vehicle shall, as nearly as possible, give to the other at least 1/2 of the main traveled portion of the roadway.

